District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.11

Use of funds; deposit of funds.

(a)

Amounts collected by the District of Columbia under this subchapter shall be deposited into the fund established by § 42-3131.01(b)(1).

(b)

Amounts in the fund established by § 42-3131.01(b)(1), may be used to pay the costs incurred by the District to demolish or enclose a structure under this subchapter.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 451
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468